Utah statutes.
19-6-112.   Notice of violations -- Order for correction -- Civil action to enforce.

(1)  Whenever the board determines that any person is in violation of any applicable approved hazardous wastes operation plan or solid waste plan, the requirements of this part, or any of the board's rules, it may cause written notice of that violation to be served upon the alleged violator.  The notice shall specify the provisions of the plan, this part or rule alleged to have been violated, and the facts alleged to constitute the violation.

(2)  The board may:

(a)  issue an order requiring that necessary corrective action be taken within a reasonable time; or

(b)  request the attorney general or the county attorney in the county in which the violation is taking place to bring a civil action for injunctive relief and enforcement of this part.

(3)  Pending promulgation of rules for corrective action under Section 19-6-105, the board may issue corrective action orders on a case-by-case basis, as necessary to carry out the purposes of this part.

